Washington statutes.
RCW 41.18.180

Firefighter contributor under prior law may obtain benefits of chapter—Refunds.

Any firefighter who has made contributions under any prior act may elect to avail himself or herself of the benefits provided by this chapter or under such prior act by filing written notice with the board within sixty days from June 7, 1961: PROVIDED, That any firefighter who has received refunds by reason of selecting the benefits of prior acts shall return the amount of such refunds as a condition to coverage under chapter 255, Laws of 1961.

[ 2007 c 218 s 59; 1961 c 255 s 12.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.